Hawaii statutes.
[§269-6.5] Electronic copies of
documents. (a) No later than July 1, 2011, the public utilities
commission shall accept from any person who submits a document to the
commission the original and one electronic copy of each application, complaint,
pleading, brief, or other document required to be filed with the commission
pursuant to this chapter and the consumer advocate shall accept service of one
paper copy and one electronic copy of each application, complaint, pleading,
brief, or other document filed with the commission.

(b) The commission shall adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this section. Until the final
adoption by the commission of rules governing the electronic filing of
documents with the commission, the following requirements shall apply to all
documents submitted to the commission pursuant to this section; provided that
additional requirements with regard to document format may be established by
the commission through written guidelines:

(1) Unless otherwise required by this chapter or the
rules or guidelines of the commission, each person who submits or files an
application, complaint, pleading, brief, or other document shall submit to or
file with the commission an original and one electronic copy of each document
and shall serve one paper copy and one electronic copy of each document on the
consumer advocate;

(2) All paper documents submitted to or filed with
the commission shall be printed on one side of the page only and, if
practicable, in portrait orientation;

(3) Original paper documents submitted to or filed
with the commission shall not be stapled but shall be clipped together or
placed in a clearly marked three-ring binder, as appropriate;

(4) All paper documents filed or submitted to the
commission shall include appropriately labeled separator pages in addition to
tabbed dividers, as applicable;

(5) All confidential documents filed under
confidential seal shall be clearly designated in accordance with the
requirements of any applicable protective order, and the sealed envelope in
which the confidential documents are enclosed shall clearly indicate the
appropriate docket number and subject;

(6) Electronic documents shall be submitted on a
clearly marked compact disk and shall be in portable document format saved in
separate files corresponding to the original paper document submission;
provided that electronic documents submitted under confidential seal shall be
submitted on a separate compact disk, clearly marked as confidential and
indicating the appropriate docket number and subject; and

(7) Electronic documents shall be named using the
filing party's name, docket number, date of filing, and name of document as
part of the document title.

Upon final adoption of rules pursuant to
chapter 91, the rules of the commission governing submission or filing of
electronic documents shall supersede the provisions of this subsection.

(c) No later than July 1, 2013, the public
utilities commission shall accept any application, complaint, pleading, brief,
or other document required to be filed with the commission pursuant to this
chapter as either a paper document or an electronic document.

(d) If a signature is required on any document
submitted electronically pursuant to this section, that requirement shall be
satisfied by the inclusion of an electronic signature. Chapter 489E shall
apply to all electronic documents submitted pursuant to this section. [L 2011,
c 69, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next